Utah statutes.
34A-6-203.   Discharge or discrimination against employee prohibited.
(1) A person may not discharge or in any manner discriminate against any
employee because:
(a)  the employee has filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceedings under or related to this chapter;
(b)  the employee has testified or is about to testify in any proceeding; or
(c) the employee has exercised any right granted by this chapter on behalf of
the employee or others.
(2) (a)  Any employee who believes that the employee has been discharged or
otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this section
may, within 30 days after the violation occurs, file a complaint with the
division in the commission alleging discrimination.
(b) (i)  Upon receipt of the complaint, the division shall cause an
investigation to be made.
(ii)  The division may employ investigators as necessary to carry out the
purpose of this Subsection (2).
(c)  If the investigator reports a violation and the employer requests a
hearing on the alleged violation, the Division of Adjudication shall hold an
evidentiary hearing to determine if provisions of this section have been
violated.
(d) (i)  If the Division of Adjudication determines that a violation has
occurred, it may order:
(A)  the violation to be restrained; and
(B)  all appropriate relief, including reinstatement of the employee to the
employee's former position with back pay.
(ii)  A determination under this Subsection (2)(d) may be appealed in
accordance with Section 34A-6-304.
